Louisiana, session 2026, HB464.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1749.17(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1749.17. Excavation or demolition; repair of damage
A.(1) Each person responsible for any excavation or demolition operations
which result in any damage to an underground facility or utility shall, immediately
upon discovery of that damage, notify the owner or operator of the utility or facility
and the regional notification center of the location and nature of the damage and shall
allow the owner or operator reasonable time to accomplish necessary repairs before
continuing the excavation, demolition, or back filling in the immediate area of
damage.
(2) Upon receiving the notification outlined in Paragraph (1) of this
Subsection, the regional notification center shall notify all owners and operators of
the utilities or facilities that are in the area that may have been damaged.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.